Hawaii, session 2025, GM1360.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE LEGISLATURE OF THE STATE OF HAWAII:
SECTION 1. The legislature finds that the State's beach
parks, scenic viewpoints, hiking trailheads, cultural sites,
wildlife habitats, and other natural resources are popular
destinations for visitors to the State. However, these sites
are often located alongside congested state highways or county
roads with limited parking.
The legislature further finds that there are
community-based organizations that collaborate with the State,
counties, visitor industry, and impacted neighborhoods to
address traffic congestion in these areas, such as the shuttle
system currently in use in Haena, Kauai, which reduces the
number of vehicles on the narrow Kuhio highway. This shuttle
system generates revenues to fund shuttle operations, as well as
improvements at the Haena state park, parking attendant
salaries, and the costs of maintaining and expanding loi and
cultural sites within Haena state park.
2025-3245 HB1422 CDl HMSO
iiHHiiiiiiiiinniiii

Page 2 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
The purpose of this Act is to exempt community-based
organizations that provide transportation services from the
State's motor carrier law, under certain circumstances.
SECTION 2. Section 271-5, Hawaii Revised Statutes, is
amended to read as follows:
"§271-5 Exen^Jtions, generally. Notwithstanding any other
provisions of this chapter, its contents shall not apply to:
(1) Persons transporting their own property where the
transportation is in furtherance of a primary business
purpose or enterprise of that person, except where the
transportation is undertaken by a motor carrier to
evade the regulatory purposes of this chapter;
(2) Persons operating motor vehicles when engaged in the
transportation of school children and teachers to and
from school, and to and from school functions;
provided that these persons may engage in providing
transportation at special rates for groups of persons
belonging to an eleemosynary or benevolent
organization or association domiciled in [this] the
State where the organization or association sponsors
or is conducting a nonregular excursion; provided
2025-3245 HB1422 CDl HMSO
iHimiiliiiiiiiiMiii

Page 3 H.I B. bX. . N’OO' .
hT2
g p
C.D. 1
further that whenever the persons engage in the
transportation of persons other than those exempted in
this paragraph, that portion of their operation shall
not be exempt from this chapter. Nothing in this
paragraph shall be construed to authorize any person
to engage in the transportation of persons, other than
the transportation of persons exempted by the terms of
this paragraph, without a permit or certificate issued
by the commission authorizing such transportation;
(3) Persons operating taxicabs or other motor vehicles
utilized in performing a bona fide taxicab service.
"Taxicab" includes:
(A) Any motor vehicle used in the movement of
passengers on the public highways under the
following circumstances, namely the passenger
hires the vehicle on call or at a fixed stand,
with or without baggage for transportation, and
controls the vehicle to the passenger's
destination;
(B) Any motor vehicle for hire having seating
accommodations for eight or fewer passengers used
2025-3245 HB1422 CDl HMSO


Page 4 H.B. NO. S”
C.D, 1
in the movement of passengers on the public
highways that may, as part of a continuous trip,
pick up or discharge passengers from various
unrelated locations; provided that they shall be
regulated by the counties in accordance with
section 46-16.5 (c); [aad] provided further that
this subparagraph shall not apply to any
exclusive rights granted by the department of
transportation for taxicab services at facilities
under the department's control; and
(C) Any motor vehicle having seating accommodations
for eight or fewer passengers used in the
movement of passengers on the public highways
between a terminal, i.e., a fixed stand, in the
Honolulu district, as defined in section 4-1 and
a terminal in a geographical district outside the
limits of the Honolulu district, and vice versa,
without picking up passengers other than at the
terminals or fixed stands; provided that the
passengers may be picked up by telephone call
from their homes in the rural area or may be
2025-3245 HB1422 CDl HMSO

Page 5 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
unloaded at any point between the fixed stands or
may be delivered to their homes in the rural
area;
(4) Persons operating motor vehicles in the transportation
of persons pursuant to a franchise from the
legislature and whose operations are presently
regulated under chapter 269;
(5) Nonprofit agricultural cooperative associations to the
extent that they engage in the transportation of their
own property or the property of their members;
(6) Persons operating motor vehicles specially constructed
for the towing of disabled or wrecked vehicles but not
otherwise used in the transportation of property for
compensation or hire;
(7) Persons operating motor vehicles in the transportation
of mail, newspapers, periodicals, magazines, messages,
documents, letters, or blueprints;
(8) Persons operating funeral cars or ambulances;
(9) Persons operating motor vehicles in the transportation
of garbage or refuse;
2025-3245 HB1422 CDl HMSO
■iiniMiniiiiiii

Page 6 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
(10) Persons operating the type of passenger carrying motor
vehicles known as "sampan buses" within the radius of
twenty miles from the city of Hilo, Hawaii;
(11) Persons transporting unprocessed pineapple to a
cannery, seed corn to a processing facility, or
returning any containers used in [such] the
transportation to the fields;
(12) Sugar plantations transporting sugarcane, raw sugar,
molasses, sugar by-products, and farming supplies for
neighboring farmers pursuant to contracts administered
by the United States Department of Agriculture;
(13) Persons engaged in the ranching or meat or feed
business who transport cattle to slaughterhouses for
hire where such transportation is their sole
transportation for hire and where their earnings from
the transportation constitute less than fifty per cent
of their gross income from their business and the
transportation for hire;
(14) Persons transporting unprocessed raw milk to
processing plants and returning any containers used in
2025-3245 HB1422 GDI HMSO 6
IIIIMinMiillllllH

Page 7 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
[ouoh] transportation to dairy farms for
reloading;
(15) Persons transporting animal feeds to animal husbandry
farmers and farming supplies directly to animal
husbandry farmers and returning any containers used in
[•eueh] tl^ transportation to these sources of [such]
the feeds and supplies for reloading;
(16) Persons engaged in transporting [ftet-] more than
fifteen passengers between their places of abode, or
termini near such places, and their places of
employment in a single daily round trip where the
driver is also on the driver's way to or from the
driver's place of employment;
(17) Persons transporting passengers without charge in
motor vehicles owned or operated by [such] person,
where [otteh-] ti^e transportation is provided in
conjunction with and in furtherance of a related
primary business purpose or enterprise of that person
and [-s^aeii] the transportation is provided only
directly to and from the place of business of [-sueh]
the person, except that this exemption shall not apply
2025-3245 HB1422 CDl HMSO 7
■■iiiiwiiiiiniin

Page 8 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
to persons making any contract, agreement, or
arrangement to provide, procure, furnish, or arrange
for transportation as a travel agent or broker or a
person engaged in tour or sightseeing activities, nor
shall this exemption apply where the transportation is
undertaken by a person to evade the regulatory
purposes of this chapter; [aftd]
(18) Persons conducting the type of county-regulated
passenger carrying operation known as "jitney
services". For the purposes of this paragraph,
"jitney services" means public transportation services
utilizing motor vehicles that have seating
accommodations for six to twenty-five passengers,
operate along specific routes during defined service
hours, and levy a flat fare schedule [—]
(19) Community-based organizations engaged in
community-based economic development providing
transportation services; provided that:
(A) The transportation services are operated within
the parameters of a state- or county-approved ,
plan that is contracted or regulated under the
2025-3245 HB1422 CDl HMSO
iiiiiiHUMiiiininin

Page 9 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
authority of that state or county government
agency. The state or county government agency
shall require, or may exceed, the minimum
requirements for commercial and business
insurance required under section 271-17;
(B) The community-based organization owns the
transportation service-related assets, and these
assets cannot be sold for personal gain for the
duration of the exemption from this chapter;
(C) Community stakeholders have a role in the
operation of the community-based organization;
ar^
(D) The state or county government agency shall
notify the commission of the agency's
determination that the community-based
organization qualifies for this exemption.
For the purposes of this paragraph;
"Community-based economic development" has the
same meaning as defined in section 210D-2.
"Community-based organization" has the same
meaning as defined in section 210D-2.
2025-3245 HB1422 CDl HMSO

Page 10 H.B. NO.
C.D. 1
"Community stakeholders" means individuals,
groups, or other organizations within the
geographically defined area served by, and that have a
direct interest in the activities and outcomes of, the
community-based organization and community-based
economic development."
SECTION 3. Statutory material to be repealed is bracketed
and stricken. New statutory material is underscored.
SECTION 4. This Act shall take effect upon its approval.
2025-3245 HB1422 CDl HMSO 10
iniliHlilllOINUIIHIIIII!

H.B. NO.
S.D. 1
C.D. 1
APPROVED this 1st day of July ,2025
GOVERNOR OF THE STATE OF HAWAII

HB No. 1422, HD 2, SD 1, CD 1
THE HOUSE OF REPRESENTATIVES OF THE STATE OF HAWAII
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawaii
We hereby certify that the above-referenced Bill on this day passed Final Reading in the
House of Representatives of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawaii, Regular Session
of2025.
Nadine K. Nakamura
Speaker
House of Representatives
Brian L. Takeshita
Chief Clerk
House of Representatives

H.B. No. 1422, H.D. 2, S.D. 1, C.D. 1
THE SENATE OF THE STATE OF HAWAPI
Date: April 30, 2025
Honolulu, Hawai‘i 96813
We hereby certify that the foregoing Bill this day passed Final Reading in the Senate
of the Thirty-Third Legislature of the State of Hawai‘i, Regular Session of 2025.
Clerk of the Senate